test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_C_zhiishiib_gt-norm.yaml
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nizhiishiibensinaanidig, nizhiishiibensinaanidog]
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nizhiishiibensinaanidig, nizhiishiibensinaanidog]
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nizhiishiibensinaanidig, nizhiishiibensinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+21+Pret+Loc: gizhiishiibenyinaanibaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+21+Pret+Obv: gizhiishiibenyinaanibaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+21+Pret+Pl: gizhiishiibenyinaanibaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+21+VocPl+Loc: [gizhiishiibenyinaanidig, gizhiishiibenyinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+21+VocPl+Obv: [gizhiishiibenyinaanidig, gizhiishiibenyinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+21+VocPl+Pl: [gizhiishiibenyinaanidig, gizhiishiibenyinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gizhiishiibenyiwaabaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gizhiishiibenyiwaabaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gizhiishiibenyiwaabaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gizhiishiibenyiwaadig, gizhiishiibenyiwaadog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gizhiishiibenyiwaadig, gizhiishiibenyiwaadog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gizhiishiibenyiwaadig, gizhiishiibenyiwaadog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+21+Pret+Loc: gizhiishiibensinaanibaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+21+Pret+Obv: gizhiishiibensinaanibaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+21+Pret+Pl: gizhiishiibensinaanibaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+21+VocPl+Loc: [gizhiishiibensinaanidig, gizhiishiibensinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+21+VocPl+Obv: [gizhiishiibensinaanidig, gizhiishiibensinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+21+VocPl+Pl: [gizhiishiibensinaanidig, gizhiishiibensinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gizhiishiibensiwaabaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gizhiishiibensiwaabaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gizhiishiibensiwaabaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gizhiishiibensiwaadig, gizhiishiibensiwaadog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gizhiishiibensiwaadig, gizhiishiibensiwaadog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gizhiishiibensiwaadig, gizhiishiibensiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+3Obv+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibenyiniibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+3Obv+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibenyiniibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+3Obv+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibenyiniibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [ozhiishiibenyiniidig, ozhiishiibenyiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [ozhiishiibenyiniidig, ozhiishiibenyiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [ozhiishiibenyiniidig, ozhiishiibenyiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+3Pl+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibenyiwaabaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+3Pl+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibenyiwaabaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+3Pl+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibenyiwaabaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ozhiishiibenyiwaadig, ozhiishiibenyiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ozhiishiibenyiwaadig, ozhiishiibenyiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ozhiishiibenyiwaadig, ozhiishiibenyiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+3Obv+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibensiniibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+3Obv+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibensiniibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+3Obv+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibensiniibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [ozhiishiibensiniidig, ozhiishiibensiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [ozhiishiibensiniidig, ozhiishiibensiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [ozhiishiibensiniidig, ozhiishiibensiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+3Pl+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibensiwaabaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+3Pl+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibensiwaabaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+3Pl+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibensiwaabaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ozhiishiibensiwaadig, ozhiishiibensiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ozhiishiibensiwaadig, ozhiishiibensiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ozhiishiibensiwaadig, ozhiishiibensiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret: nizhiishiibimishinaaniban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [nizhiishiibimishinaanidig, nizhiishiibimishinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+21+Pret: gizhiishiibimishinaaniban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl: [gizhiishiibimishinaanidig, gizhiishiibimishinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gizhiishiibimishiwaaban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [gizhiishiibimishiwaadig, gizhiishiibimishiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret: ozhiishiibimishiniiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [ozhiishiibimishiniidig, ozhiishiibimishiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret: ozhiishiibimishiwaaban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [ozhiishiibimishiwaadig, ozhiishiibimishiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Loc: nizhiishiibimishinaaning
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Obv: nizhiishiibimishinaanin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pl: nizhiishiibimishinaanig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+21+Loc: gizhiishiibimishinaaning
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+21+Obv: gizhiishiibimishinaanin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+21+Pl: gizhiishiibimishinaanig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibimishiwaang
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Obv: gizhiishiibimishiwaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibimishiwaag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Loc: ozhiishiibimishiniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Obv: ozhiishiibimishiniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pl: ozhiishiibimishiniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Loc: ozhiishiibimishiwaang
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Obv: ozhiishiibimishiwaan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pl: ozhiishiibimishiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: nizhiishiibimishibaniing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: nizhiishiibimishibaniin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: nizhiishiibimishibaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: gizhiishiibimishibaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: gizhiishiibimishibaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: gizhiishiibimishibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibimishibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibimishibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibimishibaniig
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: izhiishiibimishibaniing
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: izhiishiibimishibaniin
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: izhiishiibimishibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nizhiishiibiminaanibaniing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nizhiishiibiminaanibaniin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nizhiishiibiminaanibaniig
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nizhiishiibiminaanidig, nizhiishiibiminaanidog]
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nizhiishiibiminaanidig, nizhiishiibiminaanidog]
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nizhiishiibiminaanidig, nizhiishiibiminaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+21+Pret+Loc: gizhiishiibiminaanibaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+21+Pret+Obv: gizhiishiibiminaanibaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+21+Pret+Pl: gizhiishiibiminaanibaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+21+VocPl+Loc: [gizhiishiibiminaanidig, gizhiishiibiminaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+21+VocPl+Obv: [gizhiishiibiminaanidig, gizhiishiibiminaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+21+VocPl+Pl: [gizhiishiibiminaanidig, gizhiishiibiminaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gizhiishiibimiwaabaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gizhiishiibimiwaabaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gizhiishiibimiwaabaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gizhiishiibimiwaadig, gizhiishiibimiwaadog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gizhiishiibimiwaadig, gizhiishiibimiwaadog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gizhiishiibimiwaadig, gizhiishiibimiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibiminiibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibiminiibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibiminiibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [ozhiishiibiminiidig, ozhiishiibiminiidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [ozhiishiibiminiidig, ozhiishiibiminiidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [ozhiishiibiminiidig, ozhiishiibiminiidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3Pl+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibimiwaabaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3Pl+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibimiwaabaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3Pl+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibimiwaabaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ozhiishiibimiwaadig, ozhiishiibimiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ozhiishiibimiwaadig, ozhiishiibimiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ozhiishiibimiwaadig, ozhiishiibimiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nizhiishiibishinaanibaniing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nizhiishiibishinaanibaniin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nizhiishiibishinaanibaniig
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nizhiishiibishinaanidig, nizhiishiibishinaanidog]
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nizhiishiibishinaanidig, nizhiishiibishinaanidog]
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nizhiishiibishinaanidig, nizhiishiibishinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: gizhiishiibishinaanibaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gizhiishiibishinaanibaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gizhiishiibishinaanibaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gizhiishiibishinaanidig, gizhiishiibishinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gizhiishiibishinaanidig, gizhiishiibishinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gizhiishiibishinaanidig, gizhiishiibishinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gizhiishiibishiwaabaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gizhiishiibishiwaabaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gizhiishiibishiwaabaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gizhiishiibishiwaadig, gizhiishiibishiwaadog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gizhiishiibishiwaadig, gizhiishiibishiwaadog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gizhiishiibishiwaadig, gizhiishiibishiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibishiniibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibishiniibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibishiniibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [ozhiishiibishiniidig, ozhiishiibishiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [ozhiishiibishiniidig, ozhiishiibishiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [ozhiishiibishiniidig, ozhiishiibishiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibishiwaabaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibishiwaabaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibishiwaabaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ozhiishiibishiwaadig, ozhiishiibishiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ozhiishiibishiwaadig, ozhiishiibishiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ozhiishiibishiwaadig, ozhiishiibishiwaadog]
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret: nizhiishiibenyimishinaaniban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [nizhiishiibenyimishinaanidig, nizhiishiibenyimishinaanidog]
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret: nizhiishiibensimishinaaniban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [nizhiishiibensimishinaanidig, nizhiishiibensimishinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret: gizhiishiibenyimishinaaniban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl: [gizhiishiibenyimishinaanidig, gizhiishiibenyimishinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gizhiishiibenyimishiwaaban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [gizhiishiibenyimishiwaadig, gizhiishiibenyimishiwaadog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret: gizhiishiibensimishinaaniban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl: [gizhiishiibensimishinaanidig, gizhiishiibensimishinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gizhiishiibensimishiwaaban
